Tennessee, session 114, HB1024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-33-210(a), is amended by
deleting "a preponderance of evidence" and substituting "clear and convincing evidence".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-33-213(a), is amended by
deleting "preponderance of evidence" and substituting "clear and convincing evidence".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to seizures occurring on or after that date.
HB1024
001700
- 1 -